Nebraska, session 109, LB513.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 24-201.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
24-201.01 On July 1, 2022, the salary of the Chief Justice and the judges
of the Supreme Court shall be one hundred ninety-eight thousand four hundred
twenty-six dollars and fifty-one cents. On July 1, 2023, the salary of the
Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be two hundred twelve
thousand three hundred sixteen dollars and thirty-seven cents. On July 1, 2024,
the salary of the Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be
two hundred twenty-five thousand fifty-five dollars and thirty-five cents. On
July 1, 2025, the salary of the Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme
Court shall be two hundred twenty-eight thousand four hundred thirty-one
dollars and eighteen cents. On July 1, 2026, the salary of the Chief Justice
and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be two hundred thirty-one thousand
eight hundred fifty-seven dollars and sixty-five cents.
The Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall hold no other
public office of profit or trust during their terms of office nor accept any
public appointment or employment under the authority of the government of the
United States for which they receive compensation for their services. Such
salaries shall be payable in equal monthly installments.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. Original section 24-201.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-